California, session 20252026, AB312.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 884 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:884. (a) If If, for any reason reason, the commodity is not released to the rightful owner after being in the custody of the commissioner for 48 hours or, in the case of a highly perishable commodity, any a shorter period of time that the commissioner deems necessary, the commissioner may either sell the commodity by public auction or by private sale at fair market value to a commercial packer of the commodity, or, after 72 hours from the time of seizure, may donate the commodity to a nonprofit charitable organization. If donated, the commodity shall not be sold by the receiving party. If sold, all of the proceeds derived from the sale of the commodity shall be held by the commissioner for a period of not less than six three months, during which time the lawful owner of the commodity may submit satisfactory proof of ownership and obtain possession of the proceeds. The commissioner may require the payment by the owner of an amount sufficient to cover the costs incurred for a storage and sale of the commodity, but not to exceed the sale price of the commodity. If, after retention of the proceeds for a period of at least six three months, no demand is made or if proof of ownership is not supplied, the commissioner shall deposit the proceeds of the sale of the commodity in into the general fund of the county.(b) If the commodity is unfit for human consumption, the commissioner may destroy it.